Utah statutes.
70A-2-326.   Sale on approval and sale or return -- Rights of creditors.

(1)  Unless otherwise agreed, if delivered goods may be returned by the buyer even though they conform to the contract, the transaction is:

(a)  a "sale on approval" if the goods are delivered primarily for use; and

(b)  a "sale or return" if the goods are delivered primarily for resale.

(2) Goods held on approval are not subject to the claims of the buyer's creditors until acceptance; goods held on sale or return are subject to such claims while in the buyer's possession.

(3)  Any "or return" term of a contract for sale is to be treated as a separate contract for sale within the statute of frauds section of this chapter (Section 70A-2-201) and as contradicting the sale aspect of the contract within the provisions of this chapter on parol or extrinsic evidence (Section 70A-2-202).



Amended by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

